Utah statutes.
69-2-5.6.   Emergency services telecommunications charge to fund statewide
unified E-911 emergency service.
(1)  Subject to Subsection 69-2-5(3)(g), there is imposed a statewide unified
E-911 emergency service charge on each local exchange service switched access
line and each revenue producing radio communications access line that is
subject to an emergency services telecommunications charge levied by a county,
city, or town under Section 69-2-5 or 69-2-5.5 at:
(a)  13 cents per month until June 30, 2007; and
(b)  8 cents per month on and after July 1, 2007.
(2)  The emergency services telecommunications charge imposed under this
section shall be:
(a)  subject to Subsection 69-2-5(3)(g);
(b)  billed and collected by the person that provides:
(i)  local exchange service switched access line services;
(ii)  radio communications access line services; or
(iii)  service described in Subsection 69-2-5(3)(a)(iii).
(c)  except for costs retained under Subsection (3), remitted to the State Tax
Commission at the same time as the person remits to the State Tax Commission
money collected by the person under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax
Act; and
(d)  deposited into the Statewide Unified E-911 Emergency Service Fund
restricted account in the General Fund created by Section 53-10-603.
(3)  The person that bills and collects the charges levied by this section
pursuant to Subsections (2)(b) and (c) may:
(a)  bill the charge imposed by this section in combination with the charge
levied under Section 69-2-5 as one line item charge; and
(b)  retain an amount not to exceed 1.5% of the charges collected under this
section as reimbursement for the cost of billing, collecting, and remitting
the levy.
(4)  The State Tax Commission shall collect, enforce, and administer the
charges imposed under Subsection (1) using the same procedures used in the
administration, collection, and enforcement of the emergency services
telecommunications charge to fund the Poison Control Center under Section
69-2-5.5.
(5)  This section sunsets in accordance with Section 63I-1-269.
